Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202683-371
Department; rules and regulations.

Pursuant to the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, the department shall adopt and promulgate appropriate rules and regulations for making the determinations required by sections 83-227.01, 83-227.02, 83-350, and 83-363 to 83-379.

Laws 1969, c. 812, § 9, p. 3053;

Laws 2026, LB1048, § 36.
July 18, 2026
Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.